lv.lexc
! Nikolay Vorontsov, Latvian Nouns, 7 Jan. 2023
! Word types:
!		1st masculine: 	galds, vējs + ceļš, kaimiņš, vējš, karš
! 		2nd masculine: 	brālis, spogulis, zīmulis + 
!				a. viesis, personal names with d,t + -is Valdis, Atis
!				b. akmens, asmens, mēness, rudens, ūdens, zibens (historically -is)
!				c. *suns (historically -is, but GenSg suņa),
!		3rd masculine: 	tirgus, ledus, medus, alus, apvidus, klepus, ledus, lietus, medus, tirgus, vidus, viltus -- there is not many of them
!		4th feminine: 	istaba, laiva, ēka
!				4a. masculine: junga, lauva, puika (DatSG is different)
!		5th feminine: 	upe, ābele, glāze
! 		6th feminine:	acs, nakts, valsts


Multichar_Symbols
	+NomSg +AccSg +GenSg +LocSg +DatSg +InstSg
	+NomPl +AccPl +GenPl +LocPl +DatPl +InstPl
	%^J

LEXICON Root
        Nouns ;
!	Verbs ;

LEXICON Nouns
gald		1-decl ;

ceļ		1a-decl ;

brāl		2-decl ;

Vald		2a-decl ;	

akmen		2b-decl ;

sun		2c-decl ;

tirg		3-decl ;

istab		4-decl ;

jung		4a-decl ;

up		5-decl ;

nakt		6-decl ;

!more words to align with Russian grammar

durv 6-decl ;
rūpnīc 4-decl ;
naz 2-decl ;
portfel 2-decl ;
log 1-decl ;
jūr 4-decl ;
rok 4-decl ;
nedēļ 4-decl ;


!Noun declension in Latvian NB: instrumentalis always with ar-preposition, Moprhonological changes in 
LEXICON 1-decl
+NomSg:s			# ;
+AccSg:u			# ; 
+GenSg:a			# ;
+LocSg:ā			# ;
+DatSg:am			# ;
+InstSg:u			# ;

+NomPl:i			# ;
+AccPl:us			# ; 
+GenPl:u			# ;
+LocPl:os			# ;
+DatPl:iem			# ;
+InstPl:iem			# ;

LEXICON 1a-decl
+NomSg:š			# ;
+AccSg:u			# ; 
+GenSg:a			# ;
+LocSg:ā			# ;
+DatSg:am			# ;
+InstSg:u			# ;

+NomPl:i			# ;
+AccPl:us			# ; 
+GenPl:u			# ;
+LocPl:os			# ;
+DatPl:iem			# ;
+InstPl:iem			# ;

LEXICON 2-decl
+NomSg:is			# ;
+AccSg:i			# ; 
+GenSg:^Ja			# ;
+LocSg:ī			# ;
+DatSg:im			# ;
+InstSg:i			# ;

+NomPl:^Ji			# ;
+AccPl:^Jus			# ; 
+GenPl:^Ju			# ;
+LocPl:^Jos			# ;
+DatPl:^Jiem			# ; 
+InstPl:^Jiem			# ;


LEXICON 2a-decl
+NomSg:is			# ;
+AccSg:i			# ; 
+GenSg:a			# ;
+LocSg:ī			# ;
+DatSg:im			# ;
+InstSg:i			# ;

+NomPl:i			# ;
+AccPl:us			# ; 
+GenPl:u			# ;
+LocPl:os			# ;
+DatPl:iem			# ; 
+InstPl:iem			# ;

LEXICON 2b-decl
+NomSg:s			# ;
+AccSg:i			# ; 
+GenSg:s			# ;
+LocSg:ī			# ;
+DatSg:im			# ;
+InstSg:i			# ;

+NomPl:^Ji			# ;
+AccPl:^Jus			# ; 
+GenPl:^Ju			# ;
+LocPl:^Jos			# ;
+DatPl:^Jiem			# ; 
+InstPl:^Jiem			# ;

LEXICON 2c-decl
+NomSg:s			# ;
+AccSg:i			# ; 
+GenSg:^Ja			# ;
+LocSg:ī			# ;
+DatSg:im			# ;
+InstSg:i			# ;

+NomPl:^Ji			# ;
+AccPl:^Jus			# ; 
+GenPl:^Ju			# ;
+LocPl:^Jos			# ;
+DatPl:^Jiem			# ; 
+InstPl:^Jiem			# ;

LEXICON 3-decl
+NomSg:us			# ;
+AccSg:u			# ; 
+GenSg:us			# ;
+LocSg:ū			# ;
+DatSg:um			# ;
+InstSg:u			# ;

+NomPl:i			# ;
+AccPl:us			# ; 
+GenPl:u			# ;
+LocPl:os			# ;
+DatPl:iem			# ;
+InstPl:iem			# ;

LEXICON 4-decl
+NomSg:a			# ;
+AccSg:u			# ; 
+GenSg:as			# ;
+LocSg:ā			# ;
+DatSg:ai			# ;
+InstSg:u			# ;

+NomPl:as			# ;
+AccPl:as			# ; 
+GenPl:u			# ;
+LocPl:ās			# ;
+DatPl:ām			# ;
+InstPl:ām			# ;

LEXICON 4a-decl
+NomSg:a			# ;
+AccSg:u			# ; 
+GenSg:am			# ;
+LocSg:ā			# ;
+DatSg:ai			# ;
+InstSg:u			# ;

+NomPl:as			# ;
+AccPl:as			# ; 
+GenPl:u			# ;
+LocPl:ās			# ;
+DatPl:ām			# ;
+InstPl:ām			# ;

LEXICON 5-decl
+NomSg:e			# ;
+AccSg:i			# ; 
+GenSg:es			# ;
+LocSg:ē			# ;
+DatSg:ei			# ;
+InstSg:i			# ;

+NomPl:es			# ;
+AccPl:es			# ; 
+GenPl:^Ju			# ;
+LocPl:ēs			# ;
+DatPl:ēm			# ;
+InstPl:ēm			# ;

LEXICON 6-decl
+NomSg:s			# ;
+AccSg:i			# ; 
+GenSg:s			# ;
+LocSg:ī			# ;
+DatSg:ij			# ;
+InstSg:i			# ;

+NomPl:is			# ;
+AccPl:is			# ; 
+GenPl:^Ju			# ;
+LocPl:īs			# ;
+DatPl:īm			# ;
+InstPl:īm			# ;

END
